Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Cross references.

Exemption from garnishment for funds or benefits from pension or retirement program, §

18-4-22

.

Reimbursement of Department of Law by Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, Teachers Retirement System of Georgia, for legal services provided by assistant attorney general, etc., § 45-15-37.

Exclusion from taxable net income of amounts received from certain enumerated pension or retirement funds or systems, §

48-7-27

.

Editor’s notes.

See the editor’s notes under §

1-1-1

quoting in full the provisions of the annual reenactment of the Code and its supplement except for the provisions of this title.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Pension Game:
Age- and Gender-Based Inequities in the Retirement System,” see 25 Ga. L. Rev. 1 (1990).

For article, “Pension Reform/Simplification — An Urgent Need: Practical Proposals from the Front Lines,” see 25 Ga. L. Rev. 91 (1990).